Delaware, session 153, HB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 25, Title 6 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Subchapter XII. Veterans' Benefits and Trade Practices Â§ 2599. Prohibition from persons who are not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs receiving compensation for advising or assisting with veterans' benefits. (a)(1) No person who is not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall receive compensation for advising or assisting any individual with regard to any veteransâ benefits matter, except as permitted under federal law and provided herein. (2) No person who is not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall receive compensation for referring any individual to another person to advise or assist this individual with any veteransâ matter. (3) A person who is not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs seeking to receive compensation for advising or assisting any individual with any veteransâ benefits matter shall, before rendering any services, memorialize all terms regarding the individualâs payment of fees for services rendered in a written agreement, signed by both parties, that adheres to all criteria that would be applicable if the person seeking to receive compensation were accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs specified within 38 C.F.R. Â§14.636. (4) No person who is not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall receive any compensation, unless the person would be eligible to receive compensation for such services under 38 C.F.R. Â§ 14.636 if the person receiving compensation were accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. (5) No person who is not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall receive excessive or unreasonable fees as compensation for advising or assisting any individual with any veteransâ benefits matter. The factors articulated within 38 C.F.R. Â§14.636 that would be applicable if the person receiving compensation were accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall govern determinations of whether a fee is excessive or unreasonable. (b)(1) No person who is not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall advise or assist for compensation any individual concerning any veteransâ benefits matter without clearly providing, at the outset of the business relationship, the following disclosure, both orally and in writing: âThis business is not sponsored by or affiliated with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any State of Delaware agency, department, or commission, or any other federally chartered veteransâ service organization. Other organizations may be able to provide you with this service free of charge. Products or services offered by this business are not necessarily endorsed by any of these organizations. You may qualify for other veteransâ benefits beyond the benefits for which you are receiving services here.â The written disclosure shall appear in at least twelve-point font and shall appear in a readily noticeable and identifiable place in the personâs agreement with the individual seeking services. The individual shall verbally acknowledge understanding of the oral disclosure and shall sign the document in which the written disclosure appears, to represent understanding of these provisions. The person offering services shall retain a copy of the written disclosure while providing veteransâ benefits services for the compensation to the individual and for at least 1 year after the date on which the service relationship terminates. (2) No person who is not accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall advertise for-compensation services in veteransâ benefits matters without including the following disclosure: âÂ This business is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any State of Delaware agency, department, or commission, or any other federally chartered veteransâ service organization. Other organizations, and other federally chartered veteransâ service organizations, may be able to provide you with these services free of charge. Products or services offered by this business are not necessarily endorsed by any of these organization. You may qualify for other veteransâ benefits beyond the services that this business offers. Â â If the advertisement is printed, including but not limited to advertisements visible to internet users, the disclosure shall appear in a readily visible place on the advertisement. If the advertisement is verbal, the spoken statement of the disclosure shall be clear and intelligible. (c) Nothing in this section is to be construed as applying to, limiting, or expanding the requirements imposed on persons accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and regulated by that agency. (d) Nothing in this section is to be construed as authorizing any person to engage in any practice in violation of federal law. Â§ 2599A. Remedies. (a) A private cause of action shall be available to any victim of a violation of Â§ 2599 of this subchapter. Such cause of action may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state without prior action by the Attorney General as provided for in this section. (b) A violation of this subchapter shall be deemed an unlawful practice under Â§ 2513 of Title 6 and a violation of Subchapter II of Chapter 25 of Title 6. (c) The court may award reasonable attorneysâ fees to plaintiff if the court finds that defendant has willfully violated any agreement to cease and desist such actions in violation of Â§ 2599 of this subchapter or any court order enjoining the defendant from violating Â§ 2599 of this subchapter. (d) If any person is found to have violated Â§ 2599 of this subchapter, and said violation is committed against an elder person or a person with a disability, in addition to any civil penalty imposed, the court may impose and additional civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each violation. Â§ 2599B. Definitions. As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (1) âCompensationâ means payment of any money, thing of value, or financial benefit. (2) âElder personâ means a person who is 65 years of age or older. (3) âPersonâ Â means an individual, corporation, government, or governmental subdivision or agency, statutory trust, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, unincorporated association, 2 or more of any of the foregoing having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity. (4) âPerson with a disabilityâ means a person who has a disability as defined in Â§ 4602 of this title. (5) âVeteransâ benefits matterâ means the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed an intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity, function, or status, entitlement to which is determined under the laws and regulations administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any State of Delaware agency, department, or commission pertaining to veterans, their dependents, their survivors, and any other individual eligible for such benefits. Section 2. This Act takes effect 18 months after its enactment into law.